California, session 20252026, SB963.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30628 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:30628. (a) An appeal of an action by a local government on a coastal development permit application pursuant to Sections 30602 and 30603 shall be considered properly submitted if the appealing party or parties submit to the executive director a completed, signed copy of the appeal form provided by the commission within the applicable timeline established in commission regulations. The commission shall provide hard copies and digital copies of the appeal form upon request, and the form shall also be available on the commission’s internet website.(b) The appealing party or parties shall provide in writing the specific grounds for the appeal. The grounds for appeal shall be stated clearly in the appeal form. In describing the grounds for the appeal, the appealing party or parties shall identify the specific features of the proposed development and how they do not conform to the standards set forth in the certified local coastal program and the public access policies set forth in this division. Evidence supporting the grounds for appeal may be included as an attachment to the appeal form. Any grounds for appeal not based on the provisions of the certified local coastal program or the public access provisions of this division shall not be considered valid.(c) The executive director may reject an appeal that is submitted in a form that is not consistent with the requirements of this section.SEC. 2. Section 30629 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:30629. (a) For purposes of an appeal of an action on a coastal development permit application by a local government or a port governing body, if the commission determines that a substantial issue exists with respect to the grounds on which the appeal has been filed, after the substantial issue hearing the commission shall provide for de novo review and a public hearing on the coastal development permit application that are consistent with the deadlines and procedures of this section.(b) (1) Within 30 calendar days after the commission determines that a substantial issue exists, the executive director shall provide the permit applicant with a complete description of the information that is needed for the commission to complete a de novo review and hold a public hearing on the coastal development permit application.(2) When the applicant submits information needed pursuant to paragraph (1), the executive director shall review the submitted information and, within 30 calendar days, shall either notify the applicant in writing that the submittal is complete or, if necessary, provide a complete description of any remaining information needed. Any information subsequently submitted by the applicant to the commission shall be processed in the same manner as the initial submittal.(3) Once the executive director has received a complete submittal, the commission shall hold a de novo public hearing and act on the coastal development permit application within 180 calendar days.(4) The time limits established in paragraph (3) may be extended once upon mutual written agreement of the project applicant and the executive director for a period not to exceed 90 calendar days from the date of the extension.(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the commission from conducting a de novo review and public hearing on the same day that it determines that a substantial issue exists, if the executive director determines that the commission has the information necessary to do so.